lexc/noun/enhufnnum.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat] +Pref+

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub  +Sup +Ter
!+Sue
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §ooez3§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 


      
LEXICON Root
Prefnum;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:egy   Noun;
+Pref+:két   Noun;
+Pref+:kettő   Noun;
+Pref+:három   Noun;
+Pref+:négy   Noun;
+Pref+:öt   Noun;
+Pref+:hat   Noun;
+Pref+:hét   Noun;
+Pref+:hetes   Noun;
+Pref+:nyolc   Noun;
+Pref+:kilenc   Noun;
+Pref+:tíz   Noun;
+Pref+:húsz   Noun;
+Pref+:huszonöt   Noun;
+Pref+:harminc   Noun;
+Pref+:negyven   Noun;
+Pref+:ötven   Noun;
+Pref+:hatvan   Noun;
+Pref+:hetven   Noun;
+Pref+:nyolcvan  Noun;
+Pref+:kilencven   Noun;
+Pref+:száz   Noun;
+Pref+:ezer   Noun;
+Pref+:millió   Noun;
                Noun;


LEXICON Noun
ablakos AddNounat;
alkalmazásos AddNounat;
bites AddNounat;
centis AddNounat;
csatornás AddNounat;
csillagos AddNounat;
dimenziós AddNounat;
emeletes AddNounat;
esélyes AddNounat;
ezer AddNoun;
ezernyi AddNoun ;
ezrei AddNoun;
fajta AddNoun;
fedeles AddNounat;
felől AddNoun;
folyosós AddNounat;
fordulós AddNounat;
fürtös AddNounat;
főnyi AddNoun;
fős AddNounat;
generációs AddNounat;
gyermekes AddNounat;
gólos AddNounat;
hektáros AddNounat;
hengeres AddNounat;
hetes AddNounat;
hónapos AddNounat;
karakteres AddNounat;
kattintásos AddNounat;
kilós AddNounat;
konténeres AddNounat;
kötetes AddNounat;
lemezes AddNounat;
lépcsős AddNounat;
lírás AddNounat;
mandátumos AddNounat;
mozzanatos AddNounat;
méteres AddNounat;
méternyi AddNoun;
napos AddNounat;
normás AddNounat;
oldalas AddNounat;
perc AddNoun;
perces AddNounat;
peres AddNounat;
processzoros AddNounat;
részes AddNounat;
soros AddNounat;
szegmenses AddNounat;
szelepes AddNounat;
szemeszteres AddNounat;
személyes AddNounat;
személyi AddNoun;
szintes AddNounat;
szobás AddNounat;
százaléknyi AddNoun;
szíjas AddNounat;
szülős AddNounat;
sávos AddNounat;
találatos AddNounat;
tizedes AddNounat;
unciás AddNounat;
valóságos AddNounat;
ágyas AddNounat;
éves AddNounat;
évesség AddNoun;
évnyi AddNoun;
órás AddNounat;
üléses AddNounat;


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


!LEXICON AddNouneej
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Caseeej;

!LEXICON Caseeej
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t


LEXICON AddNounat
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possat;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
